custom-dicts/ia.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX a Y 16
SFX a   a   sta/_F     ia      ds:ista
SFX a   e   sta/_F     ie      ds:ista
SFX a   o   sta/_F     io      ds:ista
SFX a   0   sta/_F     i       ds:ista
SFX a   a   ista/_F    [^i]a   ds:ista
SFX a   e   ista/_F    [^i]e   ds:ista
SFX a   o   ista/_F    [^i]o   ds:ista
SFX a   0   ista/_F    [^aeio] ds:ista
SFX a   a   stissime/_B     ia      ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   e   stissime/_B     ie      ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   o   stissime/_B     io      ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   0   stissime/_B     i       ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   a   istissime/_B    [^i]a   ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   e   istissime/_B    [^i]e   ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   o   istissime/_B    [^i]o   ds:ista ds:issim
SFX a   0   istissime/_B    [^aeio] ds:ista ds:issim

SFX á Y 4
SFX á   a   etta/_S    [^c]a       ds:etta
SFX á   a   hetta/_S   ca          ds:etta
SFX á   e   etta/_S    e           ds:etta
SFX á   0   etta/_S    [^eo]       ds:etta

SFX b Y 10
SFX b   r   bile/_F    ar       ds:a    ds:bil
SFX b   er  ibile/_F   er       ds:i    ds:bil
SFX b   r   bile/_F    ir       ds:i    ds:bil
SFX b   -   ibile/_F   t-       ds:0    ds:tibil
SFX b   -   ibile/_F   [sx]-    ds:0    ds:sibil
SFX b   r   bilissime/_B   ar      ds:a    ds:bil   ds:issim
SFX b   er  ibilissime/_B  er      ds:i    ds:bil   ds:issim
SFX b   r   bilissime/_B   ir      ds:i    ds:bil   ds:issim
SFX b   -   ibilissime/_B  t-      ds:0    ds:tibil ds:issim
SFX b   -   ibilissime/_B  [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sibil ds:issim

SFX c Y 5
SFX c   r   bilitate/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:bil      ds:itate
SFX c   er  ibilitate/_S    er      ds:i    ds:bil      ds:itate
SFX c   r   bilitate/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:bil      ds:itate
SFX c   -   ibilitate/_S    t-      ds:0    ds:tibil    ds:itate
SFX c   -   ibilitate/_S    [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sibil    ds:itate

SFX d Y 3
SFX d   r   ntia/_S     ar  ds:a    ds:ntia
SFX d   r   ntia/_S     er  ds:e    ds:ntia
SFX d   r   entia/_S    ir  ds:i    ds:entia

SFX e Y 8
SFX e   ar   eria/_S    [^c]ar  ds:eria
SFX e   a    eria/_S    [^c]a   ds:eria
SFX e   o    eria/_S    [^c]o   ds:eria
SFX e   ar   heria/_S   car     ds:eria
SFX e   a    heria/_S   ca      ds:eria
SFX e   o    heria/_S   co      ds:eria
SFX e   0    ria/_S     e       ds:eria
SFX e   0    eria/_S    [^aeor] ds:eria

SFX é Y 2
SFX é   e   ette/_B    e           ds:ette
SFX é   0   ette/_B    [^e]        ds:ette

SFX f Y 28
SFX f   0     o-/IKH       [lrchky]   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o-/IKH       [^a]n      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o-/IKH       [^eiuy]an  po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ian   o-/IKH       ian        po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   an    o-/IKH       [euy]an    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   a     o-/IKH       a          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o-/IKH       [^si]e     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o-/IKH       [^e]se     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ie    o-/IKH       ie         po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o-/IKH       [^h]ese    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o-/IKH       [^c]hese   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   hese  o-/IKH       chese      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   i     o-/IKH       i          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     -/IKH        [dto]      po:adj ds:-
SFX f   0     o/IKH       [lrchky]   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o/IKH       [^a]n      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     o/IKH       [^eiuy]an  po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ian   o/IKH       ian        po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   an    o/IKH       [euy]an    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   a     o/IKH       a          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o/IKH       [^si]e     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   e     o/IKH       [^e]se     po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ie    o/IKH       ie         po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o/IKH       [^h]ese    po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   ese   o/IKH       [^c]hese   po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   hese  o/IKH       chese      po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   i     o/IKH       i          po:adj ds:o-
SFX f   0     0/IKH       [dto]      po:adj ds:-

SFX g Y 3
SFX g   r    ge/_S   ar   ds:age
SFX g   er   age/_S  er   ds:age
SFX g   ir   age/_S  ir   ds:age

SFX h Y 4
SFX h   a   ena/_S  a   ds:ena
SFX h   o   ena/_S  o   ds:ena
SFX h   0   na/_S   e   ds:ena
SFX h   i   ena/_S  i   ds:ena

SFX i Y 10
SFX i   r   tori/_B       ar       ds:a    ds:tori
SFX i   er  itori/_B      er       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   r   tori/_B       ir       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   -   ori/_B        t-       ds:0    ds:tori
SFX i   -   ori/_B        [sx]-    ds:0    ds:sori
SFX i   r   torissime/_B   ar       ds:a    ds:tori
SFX i   er  itorissime/_B  er       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   r   torissime/_B   ir       ds:i    ds:tori
SFX i   -   orissime/_B    t-       ds:0    ds:tori
SFX i   -   orissime/_B    [sx]-    ds:0    ds:sori

SFX j Y 5
SFX j   r   torio/_S    ar      ds:a    ds:torio
SFX j   er  itorio/_S   er      ds:i    ds:torio
SFX j   r   torio/_S    ir      ds:i    ds:torio
SFX j   -   orio/_S     t-      ds:0    ds:torio
SFX j   -   orio/_S     [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sorio

SFX k Y 5
SFX k   0   itate/_S    [auychklmnrt]   ds:itate
SFX k   -   itate/_S    [stx]-          ds:itate
SFX k   e   itate/_S    [^i]e           ds:itate
SFX k   0   etate/_S    i               ds:itate
SFX k   0   tate/_S     ie              ds:itate

SFX l Y 10
SFX l   ple     llion/_Sx       iple    ds:illion
SFX l   uple    illion/_Sx      uple    ds:illion
SFX l   a       illion/_zSx     a       ds:illion
SFX l   0       llion/_zSx      i       ds:illion
SFX l   ple     lliardo/_Sx     iple    ds:illiardo
SFX l   uple    illiardo/_Sx    uple    ds:illiardo
SFX l   a       illiardo/_zSx   a       ds:illiardo
SFX l   0       lliardo/_zSx    i       ds:illiardo
SFX l   0       llion/_JSx      enti    ds:illion
SFX l   0       lliardo/_JSx    enti    ds:illiardo

SFX m Y 3
SFX m   r   mento/_S    ar  ds:a    ds:mento
SFX m   er  imento/_S   er  ds:i    ds:mento
SFX m   r   mento/_S    ir  ds:i    ds:mento

SFX n Y 5
SFX n   r   tion/_S     ar      ds:a    ds:tion
SFX n   er  ition/_S    er      ds:i    ds:tion
SFX n   r   tion/_S     ir      ds:i    ds:tion
SFX n   -   ion/_S      t-      ds:0    ds:tion
SFX n   -   ion/_S      [sx]-   ds:0    ds:sion

SFX o Y 8
SFX o   a   smo/_S  ia      ds:ismo
SFX o   e   smo/_S  ie      ds:ismo
SFX o   o   smo/_S  io      ds:ismo
SFX o   0   smo/_S  i       ds:ismo
SFX o   a   ismo/_S [^i]a   ds:ismo
SFX o   e   ismo/_S [^i]e   ds:ismo
SFX o   o   ismo/_S [^i]o   ds:ismo
SFX o   0   ismo/_S [^aeio] ds:ismo

SFX ó Y 4
SFX ó   o   etto/_S    [^c]o       ds:etto
SFX ó   o   hetto/_S    co         ds:etto
SFX ó   e   etto/_S    e           ds:etto
SFX ó   0   etto/_S    [^eo]       ds:etto

SFX p Y 4
SFX p   a   uple/_B a   ds:upl
SFX p   o   uple/_B o   ds:upl
SFX p   e   uple/_B e   ds:upl
SFX p   i   uple/_B i   ds:upl

SFX q Y 20
SFX q   a   c/_B   ia       ds:ic
SFX q   e   c/_B   ie       ds:ic
SFX q   o   c/_B   io       ds:ic
SFX q   0   c/_B   i        ds:ic
SFX q   a   ic/_B  [^i]a    ds:ic
SFX q   e   ic/_B  [^isx]e  ds:ic
SFX q   o   ic/_B  [^i]o    ds:ic
SFX q   0   ic/_B  [^aeio]  ds:ic
SFX q   se  tic/_B  se      ds:ic
SFX q   xe  ctic/_B xe      ds:ic
SFX q   a   chissime/_B     ia       ds:ic
SFX q   e   chissime/_B     ie       ds:ic
SFX q   o   chissime/_B     io       ds:ic
SFX q   0   chissime/_B     i        ds:ic
SFX q   a   ichissime/_B    [^i]a    ds:ic
SFX q   e   ichissime/_B    [^isx]e  ds:ic
SFX q   o   ichissime/_B    [^i]o    ds:ic
SFX q   0   ichissime/_B    [^aeio]  ds:ic
SFX q   se  tichissime/_B   se      ds:ic
SFX q   xe  ctichissime/_B  xe      ds:ic

SFX r Y 10
SFX r   a   citate/_S   ia       ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   e   citate/_S   ie       ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   o   citate/_S   io       ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   0   citate/_S   i        ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   a   icitate/_S  [^i]a    ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   e   icitate/_S  [^isx]e  ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   o   icitate/_S  [^i]o    ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   0   icitate/_S  [^aeio]  ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   se  ticitate/_S  se      ds:ic   ds:itate
SFX r   xe  cticitate/_S xe      ds:ic   ds:itate
