custom-dicts/ia.dic
adoptar/_Vbct
adornar/_Vbcmt
adulciar/_Vm
affirmar/_Vbcintv
alevinar/_Vgn
allegre/_Aé
amoral/_Eako
analysar/_Vbcnt
anatomopathologia/_Saq
angelo/_Soqr
anglophilia/_Sq
antiglobal/_Eo
apodictic/_Ak
appaciar/_Vbcmt
apparer/_Vdn
appartar/_Vm
appeter/_Wbcdv
aramee/_A+f
arco/_Só
aristocratia/_Sqr
aspers-/_Wjnv
atonia/_Sqr
audiologia/_Saq
audir/_Vbcdijntv
augurar/_Vbcnt
automate/_Aoqr
balanciar/_Vim
ballottar/_Vgm
balsamo/_Sq
banca/_Sá
barbo/_Se
barca/_Sá
basse/_A+afó
bicario/_Só
bipede/_Eo
bobinar/_Vgjt
boiar/_Vg
botswanese/_E+f
broche/_Sá
buffon/_Se
cabaret/_Ua
caldiera/_Seá
caloric/_Ak
campana/_Sá
canoar/_Vg
canone/_Saqr
capitanar/_Ve
cappucio/_Só
capt-/_Wnuvw
cargar/_Vjmt
casa/_Sá
castello/_Só
caucasian/_A+f
cemento/_Se
cess-/_Wbcn
cholera/_Sq
cinquanta/_Shpxy
cinque/_Shx
circumjacer/_Vd
circumnavigar/_Vbcnt
cive/_Soqá
clar/_Aké
classar/_Vm
collective/_Aaosk
colpo/_Só
coma/_Sqr
commiss-/_Winuv
concess-/_Wbcntv
condoler/_Vd
confessional/_Eako
congenial/_Ek
constatar/_Vbcn
construct-/_Wbcintv
consult-/_jtv
consultar/_Vbcijnv
copresider/_Vd
corda/_Seá
cordar/_Veg
corde/_Se
cryptogamia/_Saq
cubo/_Saoqrsó
cyanurar/_Vn
dan/_A+f
dece/_Shpz
decis-/_Wintv
decongelar/_Vmn
decuple/_Al
deguttar/_Vj
democratia/_Sqr
demonologia/_Saq
departimentalisar/_Vn
desister/_Wd
desquamar/_Vin
destituer/_Wbc
detectar/_Vbc
disbuccar/_Vm
discargar/_Vbcjmt
disco/_Só
discongelar/_Vmn
disembracar/_Vg
disinvenenar/_Vm
dissolubile/_Ek
distar/_Vd
distillar/_Vbceint
droga/_Sae
ducenti/_hlpx
duello/_Sa
duplicar/_Vbcntuv
durar/_Vbcnv
ecclesiasta/_Sqr
eder/_Wbcnt
emollir/_Vm
emphase/_Uq
empiria/_Sqr
epicuree/_Ao
esperanto/_Sao
essamar/_Vgu
esser/_Wd
estheta/_Saoqr
eston/_E+f!
estufar/_Vj
evocar/_Vbcintv
exhiber/_Vint
exposit-/_Wintv
extract-/_Wbcnt
fabricar/_Vbcgn
facile/_Ek
ferro/_Seq
filo/_Só
flecha/_Sá
fluorescer/_Wd
fractionar/_Vbcm
franc/_A+akqf
fructificar/_Vn
gabonese/_E+f
galante/_Ee
gallophobia/_Sq
gena/_Sá
general/_Ek
gestar/_Vin
grapho/_So
hagiographia/_Saq
haitian/_A+f
haust-/_Wj
heptarchia/_Sq
hospitar/_Vg
hyperbola/_Soqr
hyperfatigabile/_Ek
hypsometria/_Sq
icone/_Sqr
imaginar/_Vbcntv
immagazinar/_Vbcg
immobile/_Eakso
impaludar/_Vmn
imprescriptibile/_Ek
impuls-/_Wntvw
ineludibile/_Ek
infirmar/_Venv
influer/_Wd
inglutir/_Vm
inspirar/_Vint
interrogar/_Vijntv
intraducibile/_Ek
ionisar/_Vbcnt
irritar/_Vbcntv
islandese/_E+f
jalnir/_Vm
kuwaiti/_E+f
laminar/_Vbcjnt
leprose/_Ae
logolatria/_Sq
ludo/_Soq
luxuriar/_Vd
mane/_Soá
manico/_Só
marcar/_Vgt
marionetta/_Sa
marshallese/_E+f
massificar/_Vn
matar/_Ve
metastabile/_Ek
microtechnologia/_Sq
modo/_Sqr
molliar/_Vbcmtu
monetar/_Vg
monolingue/_Eo
moralisar/_Vint
motivar/_Vbcnt
motto/_Só
neuropathe/_Eq
neuropsychologia/_Saq
nongenti/_lpx
nonuple/_Al
novanta/_Shpxy
nove/_Shx
occidental/_E+af
occupar/_Vbcdnt
octanta/_Shpxy
octingenti/_lpx
octo/_Shx
octuple/_Al
oculo/_Sasó
orar/_Vijnt
orthotrope/_Aoq
otologia/_Saq
parabola/_Sqr
pare/_Ek
pecia/_Sá
perfect-/_Wbcnv
perfumar/_Vet
permear/_Vbcdnt
perone/_Sao
picco/_Só
placardar/_Vg
pleuralisar/_Vn
pluripartite/_Aoq
polyhedre/_Aqr
portar/_Vbcmtv
predominar/_Vdn
probar/_Vbcintv
progame/_Aq
prorogar/_Vbcnv
pullo/_Só
pulverisar/_Vbcnt
purgar/_Vijnv
putrescer/_Wbcd
quadringenti/_lpx
quadruple/_Aló
quaranta/_Shpxy
quatro/_Shx
quingenti/_lpx
quintuple/_Al
quotidian/_Ak
raffinar/_Vemt
reexaminar/_V=n
reflexologia/_Saq
reforar/_Vg
rehabitar/_Vbc
reinvestir/_V=m
rejectar/_Vbc
rejuvenescer/_Wdm
reproduct-/_Wintvw
republican/_Ao
respons-/_Wjnv
sabotar/_Vgt
sahelian/_A+f
salto/_Só
sapon/_Seá
seducer/_Wbcm
sella/_Se
septanta/_Shpxy
septe/_Shx
septingenti/_lpx
septuple/_Al
sequestrar/_Vbcn
sescenti/_lpx
sex/_Shx
sexanta/_Shpxy
sextuple/_Al
siccar/_Vjntv
sloven/_A+f
sorpt-/_Wnv
spina/_Sá
spinose/_Ak
spiritual/_Eakos
sport/_Ua
stabilir/_Vmt
stakhanovista/_Eq
sufflo/_Só
suffrer/_Vbcdt
supererogar/_Vin
synchronia/_Soqr
tamponar/_Vgmt
togolese/_E+f
traducer/_Wbc
transmutar/_Vbcnv
trenta/_Shpxy
tripa/_Se
triple/_Aló
tropo/_Soq
tubo/_Saeó
valise/_Sá
vannar/_Vgtu
varie/_Ak
vaticinar/_Vint
verso/_Só
vetule/_Aé
videophonia/_Sq
vinti/_Ahpxy
vomer/_Wijv
wagon/_Sá
